South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1039.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-53-190(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: 1. 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine 2. 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine 3. 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA) 4. 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine 5. Bufotenine 6. Diethyltryptamine (DET) 7. Dimethyltryptamine (DMT) 8.5. 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine (STP) 9.6. Ibogaine 10.7. Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD) 11.8. Marijuana 12.9. Mescaline 13.10. Peyote 14.11. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate 15.12. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate 16.13. Psilocybin 17.14. Psilocyn 18.15. Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) 19.16. 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 20.17. 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine 21.18. 4-Methoxyamphetamine 22.19. Thiophene analog of phencyclidine 23.20. Parahexyl 24.21. Synthetic cannabinoids.-Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that is not listed as a controlled substance in Schedule I through V, is not an FDA-approved drug, and contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric), homologues, and salts of isomers and homologues, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, homologues, and salts of isomers and homologues is possible within the specific chemical designation: a. Naphthoylindoles. Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to, JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-122, JWH-200, JWH-210, JWH-398, AM-2201, WIN 55-212, AM-2201 (C1 analog), AM-1220. b. Naphthylmethylindoles. Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. c. Naphthoylpyrroles. Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to, JWH-307, JWH-370, JWH-176. d. Naphthylmethylindenes. Any compound containing a naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. e. Phenylacetylindoles. Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to, SR-18, RCS-8, JWH-203, JWH-250, JWH-251. f. Cyclohexylphenols. Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to, CP 47,497 (and homologues), cannabicyclohexanol, CP-55, 940. g. Benzoylindoles. Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), RCS-4, AM-630, AM-1241, AM-2233. h. 2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo [1,2,3-de]-1, 4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone (WIN 55,212-2). i. 9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethy l-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol 7370 (HU-210, HU-211). j. Adamantoylindoles. Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by a alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the adamantyl ring system to any extent. 22. Substituted Tryptamines. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing a 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine, for example tryptamine, structure with or without mono- or di-substitution of the amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups, or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure, whether or not substituted at the alpha position with an alkyl group, whether or not substituted on the indole ring to any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy groups, including, but not limited to: a. Bufotenine, b. DET (Diethyltryptamine), c. DMT (Dimethyltryptamine), d. Methyltryptamine, e. 5-MeO-DMT (5-Methoxy-N,N,Dimethyltryptamine), f. 5-MeO-DiPT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine), g. MET (N-Methyl-N-ethyltryptamine), h. DALT (N,N-Diallyltryptamine), i. EiPT (N-Ethyl-N-isopropyltryptamine), j. MiPT (N-Methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine), k. 5-Hydroxy-AMT (5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine), l. 5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine, m. 5-MeO-MiPT (5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine), n. 5-MeO-AMT (5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine), o. 5-Me-DMT (5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine), p. DiPT (N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine), q. DPT (N,N-Dipropyltryptamine), r. 4-Hydroxy-DiPT (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine), s. 5-MeO-DALT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diallyltryptamine), t. 4-AcO-DMT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine), u. 4-AcO-DiPT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine), v. 4-Hydroxy-DET (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine), x. 4-Hydroxy-MET (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine), y. 4-Hydroxy-MiPT (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine), z. Methyl-alpha-ethyltryptamine, aa. Bromo-DALT (Bromo-N,N-diallyltryptamine), bb. 6-MeO-DMT (6-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine), cc. 5-OH-DMT (5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine), dd. 4-AcO-DET (4-Acetoxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----